Washington, session 2025-2026, HB1167.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:Sec. 1. 2024 c 234 s 3 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:(1) The statewide career and technical education task force is established in the office of the superintendent of public instruction. The members of the task force are as follows:(a) The superintendent of public instruction or the superintendent's designee;(b) Two representatives from a statewide organization representing career and technical education, at least one of whom must be a career and technical education core plus classroom instructor;(c) A representative of career and technical education core plus aerospace and advanced manufacturing selected by an organization representing aerospace or advanced industrial manufacturers;(d) A representative of career and technical education core plus construction selected by an organization representing general contractors;(e) A representative of career and technical education core plus maritime selected by an organization representing maritime interests;(f) A representative from the state board for community and technical colleges selected by the state board for community and technical colleges;(g) A representative from a skill center as selected by the Washington state skill center association;(h) A representative from the allied health industry; and(i) A representative from the workforce training and education coordinating board selected by the workforce training and education coordinating board.(2) The superintendent of public instruction or the superintendent's designee shall chair the task force, and staff support for the task force must be provided by the office of the superintendent of public instruction.(3) The task force shall develop recommendations for:(a) Expanding and strengthening the accessibility, stability, and uniformity of secondary work-integrated learning opportunities, including career and technical education, career connected learning, regional apprenticeship programs, career and technical education core plus programs, work-based learning, internships and externships, opportunities that lead or articulate to public and private postsecondary education programs approved by the United States coast guard for awarding the standards of training, certification, and watchkeeping credentials, and other types of work-integrated learning. Recommendations required by this subsection (3)(a) should address governance, operations, and codification, and must be in the form of draft legislation. The legislature does not intend for recommendations required by this subsection (3)(a) to modify the operation of career and technical education core plus programs established prior to January 1, 2024;(b) The successful administration and operation of career and technical education core plus programs through appropriate collaboration with industry sector leadership from program areas to inform the administration and continual improvement of the programs, review data outcomes, recommend program improvements, ensure that the programs reflect applicable industry competencies, and identify appropriate program credentials; and(c) A career and technical education core plus model framework that can be used to guide the expansion, establishment, and operation of career and technical education core plus programs. In making recommendations in accordance with this subsection (3)(c), the task force must consider, at a minimum, the following:(i) Curricula and instructional hours that lead or articulate to industry-recognized nondegree credentials;(ii) Curricula provided without cost to educators;(iii) Academic course equivalencies;(iv) Courses and course sequencing;(v) The development, maintenance, and expansion of industry, labor, and community partnerships;(vi) Program credentials;(vii) Training and professional development for educators and counselors;(viii) Alignment with postsecondary education and training programs;(ix) The promotion of student, family, and community awareness of career and technical education core plus programs, including instructional offerings and potential work placement opportunities; and(x) The development and expansion of a cohort of employers willing to hire and place students that have successfully completed career and technical education core plus programs.(4) The task force, in accordance with RCW 43.01.036, shall report its findings and recommendations to the governor, the appropriate fiscal and policy committees of the legislature, and the state board of education by November 15, 2025.(5) This section expires June 30, 2026.--- END ---